hr-HR: Problem vlasišta: Alopecija; Oštećena kosa; Perut; Suho vlasište; Gubitak kose; Prorjeđivanje kose; Vlasište koje svrbi; Masno vlasište; Psorijaza; Za osjetljivo vlasište; Ostalo
sk-SK: Problém pokožky hlavy: Alopécia; Poškodené vlasy; Lupiny; Suchá pokožka hlavy; Vypadávanie vlasov; Rednutie vlasov; Svrbenie pokožky hlavy; Mastná pokožka hlavy; Psoriáza; Pre citlivú pokožku hlavy; Iné
sv: Hårbottenproblem: Alopeci; Skadat hår; Mjäll; Torr hårbotten; Håravfall; Tunnare hår; Kliande hårbotten; Fet hårbotten; Psoriasis; Känslig hårbotten; Övrigt
zh-CN: 头皮问题: 脱发症; 受损发质; 头皮屑; 干性头皮; 脱发; 发质稀疏; 头皮瘙痒; 油性头皮; 牛皮癣; 敏感头皮型; 其他
da: Hovedbundsproblem: Alopeci; Skadet hår; Skæl; Tør hovedbund; Hårtab; Hårudtynding; Kløende hovedbund; Fedtet hovedbund; Psoriasis; Følsom hovedbund; Andet
es: Preocupación del cuero cabelludo: Alopecia; Cabello dañado; Caspa; Cuero cabelludo seco; Pérdida de cabello; Adelgazamiento del cabello; Picazón del cuero cabelludo; Cuero cabelludo graso; Psoriasis; Cuero cabelludo sensible; Otros
hu: Fejbőrprobléma: Alopécia; Sérült haj; Korpásodás; Száraz fejbőr; Hajhullás; Hajritkulás; Viszkető fejbőr; Zsíros fejbőr; Pikkelysömör; Érzékeny fejbőr; Egyéb
fr: Problème de cuir chevelu: Alopécie; Cheveux abîmés; Pellicules; Cuir chevelu sec; Perte de cheveux; Cheveux clairsemés; Cuir chevelu irrité; Cuir chevelu gras; Psoriasis; Cuir chevelu sensible; Autre
bg-BG: Проблем със скалпа: Алопеция; Увредена коса; Пърхот; Сух скалп; Косопад; Оредяване на косата; Сърбящ скалп; Мазен скалп; Псориазис; Чувствителен скалп; Други
ro-RO: Problemă de scalp: Alopecie; Păr deteriorat; Mătreață; Scalp uscat; Cădere păr; Subțiere păr; Scalp cu mâncărime; Scalp gras; Psoriazis; Scalp sensibil; Altele
zh-TW: 頭皮問題: 禿髮症; 受損髮質; 頭皮屑; 乾燥頭皮; 落髮; 髮絲稀疏; 頭皮搔癢; 油性頭皮; 乾癬; 敏感頭皮專用; 其他
pt-BR: Preocupação com o couro cabeludo: Alopecia; Cabelo danificado; Caspa; Couro cabeludo seco; Queda de cabelo; Afinamento capilar; Couro cabeludo com coceira; Couro cabeludo oleoso; Psoríase; Couro cabeludo sensível; Outro
ru: Проблема кожи головы: Алопеция; Поврежденные волосы; Перхоть; Сухая кожа головы; Выпадение волос; Истончение волос; Зуд кожи головы; Жирная кожа головы; Псориаз; Для чувствительной кожи головы; Другой
pt-PT: Preocupação com o couro cabeludo: Alopecia; Cabelo danificado; Caspa; Couro cabeludo seco; Queda de cabelo; Cabelo rarefeito; Couro cabeludo com comichão; Couro cabeludo oleoso; Psoríase; Couro cabeludo sensível; Outro
nl: Hoofdhuidprobleem: Alopecia; Beschadigd haar; Roos; Droge hoofdhuid; Haaruitval; Dunner wordend haar; Jeukende hoofdhuid; Vette hoofdhuid; Psoriasis; Gevoelige hoofdhuid; Andere
el: Πρόβλημα τριχωτού κεφαλής: Αλωπεκία; Κατεστραμμένα μαλλιά; Πιτυρίδα; Ξηρό τριχωτό; Τριχόπτωση; Αραίωση μαλλιών; Κνησμός τριχωτού; Λιπαρό τριχωτό; Ψωρίαση; Ευαίσθητο τριχωτό; Άλλο
ja: 頭皮の悩み: 脱毛症; ダメージヘア; フケ; 乾燥頭皮; 脱毛; 髪の薄毛; かゆみ頭皮; 脂性頭皮; 乾癬; 敏感頭皮; その他
sl-SI: Težava lasišča: Alopecija; Poškodovani lasje; Prhljaj; Suho lasišče; Izpadanje las; Redčenje las; Srbeče lasišče; Mastno lasišče; Luskavica; Za občutljivo lasišče; Drugo
cs: Problém pokožky hlavy: Alopecie; Poškozené vlasy; Lupy; Suchá pokožka hlavy; Vypadávání vlasů; Řídnutí vlasů; Svědící pokožka hlavy; Mastná pokožka hlavy; Psoriáza; Pro citlivou pokožku hlavy; Jiné
vi: Vấn đề da đầu: Rụng tóc từng mảng; Tóc hư tổn; Gàu; Da đầu khô; Rụng tóc; Tóc mỏng; Da đầu ngứa; Da đầu nhờn; Vẩy nến; Da đầu nhạy cảm; Khác
ko: 두피 고민: 탈모증; 손상된 모발; 비듬; 건조한 두피; 탈모; 모발 가늘어짐; 가려운 두피; 지성 두피; 건선; 민감한 두피용; 기타
lt-LT: Galvos odos problema: Alopecija; Pažeisti plaukai; Pleiskanos; Sausa galvos oda; Plaukų slinkimas; Plaukų retėjimas; Niežtinti galvos oda; Riebi galvos oda; Psoriazė; Jautriai galvos odai; Kita
it: Problema del cuoio capelluto: Alopecia; Capelli danneggiati; Forfora; Cuoio capelluto secco; Perdita di capelli; Diradamento capelli; Cuoio capelluto pruriginoso; Cuoio capelluto grasso; Psoriasi; Cuoio capelluto sensibile; Altro
nb: Hodebunnsbekymring: Alopecia; Skadet hår; Flass; Tørr hodebunn; Hårtap; Tynnere hår; Kløende hodebunn; Fet hodebunn; Psoriasis; Sensitiv hodebunn; Annet
en: Scalp concern: Alopecia; Damaged hair; Dandruff; Dry scalp; Hair loss; Hair thinning; Itchy scalp; Oily scalp; Psoriasis; Sensitive scalp; Other
tr: Saç derisi sorunu: Alopesi; Hasarlı saç; Kepek; Kuru saç derisi; Saç dökülmesi; Saç incelmesi; Kaşıntılı saç derisi; Yağlı saç derisi; Sedef hastalığı; Hassas saç derisi; Diğer
de: Kopfhautproblem: Alopezie; Geschädigtes Haar; Schuppen; Trockene Kopfhaut; Haarausfall; Haarausdünnung; Juckende Kopfhaut; Fettige Kopfhaut; Psoriasis; Empfindliche Kopfhaut; Sonstiges
fi: Päänahan ongelma: Alopesia; Vaurioituneet hiukset; Hilse; Kuiva päänahka; Hiustenlähtö; Hiusten oheneminen; Kutiseva päänahka; Rasvainen päänahka; Psoriaasi; Herkälle päänahalle; Muu
pl: Problem skóry głowy: Łysienie; Zniszczone włosy; Łupież; Sucha skóra głowy; Wypadanie włosów; Przerzedzenie włosów; Swędząca skóra głowy; Przetłuszczająca się skóra głowy; Łuszczyca; Dla wrażliwej skóry głowy; Inne
th: ความกังวลหนังศีรษะ: โรคผมร่วง; ผมเสีย; รังแค; หนังศีรษะแห้ง; ผมร่วง; ผมบาง; หนังศีรษะคัน; หนังศีรษะมัน; โรคสะเก็ดเงิน; สำหรับหนังศีรษะแพ้ง่าย; อื่นๆ